Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.170

Establishment of a corporate filing system using other methods authorized.

(1) If the secretary of state determines that the public interest and the purpose of the filing and registration statutes administered by the secretary of state would be best served by a filing system utilizing microfilm, microfiche, methods of reduced-format document recording, or electronic or online filing, the secretary of state may, by rule adopted under chapter 34.05 RCW, establish such a filing system.

(2) In connection with a reduced-format filing system, the secretary of state may eliminate any requirement for a duplicate original filing copy, and may establish reasonable requirements concerning paper size, print legibility, and quality for photo-reproduction processes as may be necessary to ensure utility and readability of any reduced-format filing system.

(3) In connection with an electronic or online filing system, the secretary of state may eliminate any requirement for a duplicate original filing copy and may establish reasonable requirements for electronic filing, including but not limited to signature technology, file format and type, delivery, types of filing that may be completed electronically, and methods for the return of filed documents.

[ 2002 c 74 s 20; 1982 c 35 s 191.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—2002 c 74: See note following RCW 19.09.020.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—Application—1982 c 35: See notes following RCW 43.07.160.